New York, session 2025-2026, S4515.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 196-b of the labor law, as added 2 by section 1 of part J of chapter 56 of the laws of 2020, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 1. Every employer shall be required to provide its employees with sick 5 leave as follows: 6 a. [For] Except as provided in paragraph b of this subdivision, for 7 employers with four or fewer employees in any calendar year, each 8 employee shall be provided with up to forty hours of unpaid sick leave 9 in each calendar year; provided, however, an employer that employs four 10 or fewer employees in any calendar year and that has a net income of 11 greater than one million dollars in the previous tax year shall provide 12 each employee with up to forty hours of paid sick leave pursuant to this 13 section; 14 b. For employers with between five and ninety-nine employees in any 15 calendar year and all employers of one or more domestic workers, each 16 employee shall be provided with up to forty hours of paid sick leave in 17 each calendar year. For purposes of this subdivision, "domestic worker" 18 shall mean any domestic worker as such term is defined in subdivision 19 sixteen of section two of this chapter; and 20 c. For employers with one hundred or more employees in any calendar 21 year, each employee shall be provided with up to fifty-six hours of paid 22 sick leave each calendar year. 23 For purposes of determining the number of employees pursuant to this 24 subdivision, a calendar year shall mean the twelve-month period from EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08766-01-5 S. 4515 2 1 January first through December thirty-first. For all other purposes, a 2 calendar year shall either mean the twelve-month period from January 3 first through December thirty-first, or a regular and consecutive 4 twelve-month period, as determined by an employer. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.